fr: Sommier requis: Non requis; Facultatif; Requis; Autre
pl: Wymaganie dotyczące box spring: Niewymagane; Opcjonalne; Wymagane; Inne
zh-TW: 床箱需求: 不需要; 選用; 必備; 其他
nl: Boxspring vereiste: Niet vereist; Optioneel; Vereist; Overig
ru: Требования для пружинного блока: Не требуется; Необязательно; Требуется; Другое
pt-PT: Requisitos do estrado de molas: Não necessário; Opcional; Obrigatório; Outro
sv: Krav på resårmadrasser: Krävs inte; Valfritt; Krävs; Övrigt
nb: Krav til boksmadrass: Ikke påkrevd; Valgfritt; Påkrevd; Annet
en: Box spring requirement: Not required; Optional; Required; Other
ro-RO: Cerință suport pentru saltele: Nu este necesar; Opțional; Necesar; Altele
de: Anforderungen an den Lattenrost: Nicht erforderlich; Optional; Erforderlich; Sonstige
vi: Yêu cầu khung lò xo: Không yêu cầu; Tùy chọn; Bắt buộc; Khác
bg-BG: Изискване за подматрачна рамка: Не се изисква; По избор; Изисква се; Други
zh-CN: 盒簧要求: 不需要; 可选; 必选; 其他
tr: Yaylı baza gerekliliği: Gerekli değil; İsteğe bağlı; Gerekli; Diğer
el: Απαίτηση υποστρώματος με ελατήρια: Δεν απαιτείται; Προαιρετικό; Απαιτείται; Άλλο
hu: Rugós ágyalap követelménye: Nem szükséges; Opcionális; Szükséges; Egyéb
ko: 박스 스프링 요구 사항: 불필요; 선택 사항; 필수; 기타
sl-SI: Zahteva za vzmetnico: Ni obvezno; Izbirno; Obvezno; Drugo
sk-SK: Požiadavky na pružinový box: Nevyžaduje sa; Voliteľný; Vyžaduje sa; Iný
ja: ボックススプリングの要件: 不要; 任意; 必須; その他
th: ข้อกำหนดสำหรับฐานรองที่นอนแบบบ็อกซ์สปริง: ไม่จำเป็นต้องใช้; มีหรือไม่มีก็ได้; จำเป็นต้องใช้; อื่นๆ
da: Krav til boxmadras: Ikke påkrævet; Valgfrit; Påkrævet; Andet
cs: Nutnost boxspringové (spodní) matrace: Nevyžaduje se; Volitelné; Vyžaduje se; Jiné
hr-HR: Zahtjev za podnožje s opružnim okvirom: Nije obavezno; Neobavezno; Obavezno; Ostalo
fi: Joustinpohjan vaatimus: Ei vaadita; Valinnainen; Vaaditaan; Muu
it: Requisiti della rete a doghe: Non richiesto; Facoltativo; Richiesto; Altro
es: Requisito de somier: No requerido; Opcional; Requerido; Otro
pt-BR: Requisitos do estrado de molas: Não obrigatório; Opcional; Obrigatório; Outro
lt-LT: Lovos pagrindo reikalavimas: Nereikalinga; Pasirenkama; Reikalinga; Kita